New York, session 2025-2026, S3542.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 11-0103 of the environmental conservation law is 2 amended by adding a new subdivision 33 to read as follows: 3 33. "Unmanned aerial vehicle" means any aircraft that is operated 4 without the possibility of direct human intervention from within or on 5 the aircraft. 6 § 2. Section 11-0901 of the environmental conservation law is amended 7 by adding a new subdivision 18 to read as follows: 8 18. a. No person shall use an unmanned aerial vehicle to search for, 9 scout, locate, hunt, detect, or otherwise aid in the taking of a wild 10 animal to which the hunting season applies. 11 b. A person may operate an unmanned aerial vehicle with infrared abil- 12 ities to recover a legally taken animal, but no person shall be author- 13 ized to enter the property of another person or recover a legally taken 14 animal from the property of another person without the permission of the 15 property owner. 16 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD08069-01-5